Florida, session 2026, HB417.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (15) and (16) are added to section
1001.43, Florida Statutes, to read:
1001.43 Supplemental powers and duties of district school
board.—The district school board may exercise the following
supplemental powers and duties as authorized by this code or
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb417-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 417 2026
State Board of Education rule.
(15) PARENTAL NOTIFICATION OF STUDENT CAREER AND TECHNICAL
EDUCATIONAL OPTIONS.—Before the end of grade 5 and each school
year thereafter, each student and his or her parent must be
provided a list of schools within the school district that offer
career and technical education programs and a description of
each program.
(16) CAREER AND ACADEMIC PLANNING MEETING.—Before course
registration for students entering grade 9, each district school
board must require each middle school to hold a career and
academic planning meeting for grade 8 students and their
parents. The meeting must include the following information:
(a) A list of schools within the school district that
offer career and technical education programs and a description
of each program.
(b) Information relating to career and postsecondary
planning.
(c) The eligibility requirements for federal and state
grants and scholarships, including the requirements for each
Florida Bright Futures Scholarship Program award.
(d) Information obtained from the Department of Commerce,
local workforce boards, and CareerSource Florida, Inc., about
career and academic jobs available in the region of the school
district, including starting salaries.
(e) Information relating to dual enrollment opportunities
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb417-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 417 2026
with public and private postsecondary educational institutions
in the region for high school students, including admission
requirements. For purposes of this paragraph, "region" means the
Florida College System service area in which the school district
is located.
(f) A demonstration of Florida's online career planning
and work-based learning coordination system and how to access
the student's personalized academic and career plan.
Section 2. Paragraph (e) of subsection (1) of section
1003.4156, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1003.4156 General requirements for middle grades
promotion; student personalized academic and career plan
requirements.—
(1) In order for a student to be promoted to high school
from a school that includes middle grades 6, 7, and 8, the
student must successfully complete the following courses:
(e)1. One course in career and education planning to be
completed in grades 6, 7, or 8, which may be taught by any
member of the instructional staff. The course must be Internet-
based, customizable to each student, and include research-based
assessments to assist students in determining educational and
career options and goals. In addition, the course must result in
a completed personalized academic and career plan for the
student, which must use, when available, Florida's online career
planning and work-based learning coordination system. The course
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb417-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 417 2026
must teach each student how to access and update the plan and
encourage the student to access and update the plan at least
annually as the student progresses through middle school and
high school. The personalized academic and career plan must
emphasize the importance of entrepreneurship and employability
skills and must include information from the Department of
Commerce's economic security report under s. 445.07 and other
state career planning resources. The required personalized
academic and career plan must inform students of high school
graduation requirements, including a detailed explanation of the
requirements for earning a high school diploma designation under
s. 1003.4285 and the career and technical education pathway to
earn a standard high school diploma under s. 1003.4282(10); the
requirements for each scholarship in the Florida Bright Futures
Scholarship Program; state university and Florida College System
institution admission requirements; available opportunities to
earn college credit in high school, including Advanced Placement
courses; the International Baccalaureate Program; the Advanced
International Certificate of Education Program; dual enrollment,
including career dual enrollment; career and technical education
programs available within the school district; work-based
learning opportunities, including internships and
preapprenticeship and apprenticeship programs; and career
education courses, including career-themed courses and course
100 sequences that lead to industry certification pursuant to s.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb417-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 417 2026
101 1003.492 or s. 1008.44. The course may be implemented as a
102 stand-alone course or integrated into another course or courses.
103 2. Beginning when a student enters grade 9, the student's
104 personalized academic and career plan must be reviewed annually
105 and include a demonstration of the state's online career
106 planning and work-based learning coordination system.
107 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb417-00